Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2184HV (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 522 Section 1. Section 256.25, subsection 7, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 7. For purposes of this section , âtherapeutic classroomâ 3 means a classroom designed for the purpose of providing support 4 for any student whose emotional, social, or behavioral needs 5 interfere with the studentâs ability to be successful in the 6 current educational environment, with or without supports, 7 until the student is able to successfully return to the 8 studentâs current education environment, with or without 9 supports, including but not limited to the general education 10 classroom. The support provided by a therapeutic classroom may 11 include all of the following: 12 a. Supporting student access to micronutrients, vitamin 13 supplementation, and mineral supplementation, including vitamin 14 âDâ and vitamin âK2â. 15 b. Assessing the macro-nutritional needs of students. 16 c. Providing minimally processed whole foods, including 17 fresh fruits, fresh vegetables, and healthy animal-derived fats 18 and proteins, including eggs, full-fat dairy products, beef, 19 and bacon. 20 d. Restricting the use and availability of artificial or 21 synthetic food additives that may have an adverse effect on 22 activity and attention in students. 23 e. Remediating the negative impacts of excessive use of 24 digital screens and devices on human biology. 25 f. Increasing student exposure to natural light or the light 26 emitted by full spectrum lighting fixtures. 27 g. Carrying out any other scientifically supported 28 initiative that a school district reasonably believes will 29 improve emotional, social, and behavioral health outcomes among 30 students. 31